Illinois, session 104th, SB3221.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Sections 102, 204, 206, and 208 and by 6adding Section 309.1 as follows: 7    (720 ILCS 570/102)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1102)8    Sec. 102. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 9context otherwise requires: 10    (a) "Person with a substance use disorder" means any 11person who has a substance use disorder diagnosis defined as a 12spectrum of persistent and recurring problematic behavior that 13encompasses 10 separate classes of drugs: alcohol; caffeine; 14cannabis; hallucinogens; inhalants; opioids; sedatives, 15hypnotics and anxiolytics; stimulants; and tobacco; and other 16unknown substances leading to clinically significant 17impairment or distress. 18    (b) "Administer" means the direct application of a 19controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, 20ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient, 21research subject, or animal (as defined by the Humane 22Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act) by: 23        (1) a practitioner (or, in his or her presence, by his   SB3221- 2 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    or her authorized agent), 2        (2) the patient or research subject pursuant to an 3    order, or 4        (3) a euthanasia technician as defined by the Humane 5    Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act. 6    (c) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf 7of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, 8dispenser, prescriber, or practitioner. It does not include a 9common or contract carrier, public warehouseman or employee of 10the carrier or warehouseman. 11    (c-1) "Anabolic Steroids" means any drug or hormonal 12substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to 13testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins, 14corticosteroids, and dehydroepiandrosterone), and includes: 15    (i) 3[beta],17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 16    (ii) 3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 17    (iii) 5[alpha]-androstan-3,17-dione, 18    (iv) 1-androstenediol (3[beta], 19        17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene), 20    (v) 1-androstenediol (3[alpha], 21        17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene), 22    (vi) 4-androstenediol  23        (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene), 24    (vii) 5-androstenediol  25        (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene), 26    (viii) 1-androstenedione    SB3221- 3 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        ([5alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione), 2    (ix) 4-androstenedione  3        (androst-4-en-3,17-dione), 4    (x) 5-androstenedione  5        (androst-5-en-3,17-dione), 6    (xi) bolasterone (7[alpha],17a-dimethyl-17[beta]- 7        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 8    (xii) boldenone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost- 9        1,4,-diene-3-one), 10    (xiii) boldione (androsta-1,4- 11        diene-3,17-dione), 12    (xiv) calusterone (7[beta],17[alpha]-dimethyl-17 13        [beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 14    (xv) clostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]- 15        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 16    (xvi) dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro- 17        17[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl- 18        androst-1,4-dien-3-one), 19    (xvii) desoxymethyltestosterone 20    (17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha] 21        -androst-2-en-17[beta]-ol)(a.k.a., madol), 22    (xviii) [delta]1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a.  23        '1-testosterone') (17[beta]-hydroxy- 24        5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 25    (xix) 4-dihydrotestosterone (17[beta]-hydroxy- 26        androstan-3-one),   SB3221- 4 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    (xx) drostanolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2[alpha]-methyl- 2        5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 3    (xxi) ethylestrenol (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]- 4        hydroxyestr-4-ene), 5    (xxii) fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17[alpha]-methyl- 6        1[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 7    (xxiii) formebolone (2-formyl-17[alpha]-methyl-11[alpha], 8        17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one), 9    (xxiv) furazabol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 10        hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan), 11    (xxv) 13[beta]-ethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one, 12    (xxvi) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17[beta]-dihydroxy- 13        androst-4-en-3-one), 14    (xxvii) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17[beta]- 15        dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one), 16    (xxviii) mestanolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 17        hydroxy-5-androstan-3-one), 18    (xxix) mesterolone (1amethyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 19        [5a]-androstan-3-one), 20    (xxx) methandienone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 21        hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one), 22    (xxxi) methandriol (17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]- 23        dihydroxyandrost-5-ene), 24    (xxxii) methenolone (1-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 25        5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 26    (xxxiii) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta], 17[beta]-   SB3221- 5 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 2    (xxxiv) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy 3        -5a-androstane, 4    (xxxv) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]- 5        dihydroxyandrost-4-ene), 6    (xxxvi) 17[alpha]-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17[alpha]- 7        methyl-4-hydroxy-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 8    (xxxvii) methyldienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 9        hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one), 10    (xxxviii) methyltrienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 11        hydroxyestra-4,9-11-trien-3-one), 12    (xxxix) methyltestosterone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 13        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 14    (xl) mibolerone (7[alpha],17a-dimethyl-17[beta]- 15        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 16    (xli) 17[alpha]-methyl-[delta]1-dihydrotestosterone  17        (17b[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]- 18        androst-1-en-3-one)(a.k.a. '17-[alpha]-methyl- 19        1-testosterone'), 20    (xlii) nandrolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 21    (xliii) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]- 22        dihydroxyestr-4-ene), 23    (xliv) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]- 24        dihydroxyestr-4-ene), 25    (xlv) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]- 26        dihydroxyestr-5-ene),   SB3221- 6 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    (xlvi) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]- 2        dihydroxyestr-5-ene), 3    (xlvii) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione  4        (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione), 5    (xlviii) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4- 6        en-3,17-dione), 7    (xlix) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5- 8        en-3,17-dione), 9    (l) norbolethone (13[beta], 17a-diethyl-17[beta]- 10        hydroxygon-4-en-3-one), 11    (li) norclostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]- 12        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 13    (lii) norethandrolone (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]- 14        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 15    (liii) normethandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 16        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 17    (liv) oxandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 18        2-oxa-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 19    (lv) oxymesterone (17[alpha]-methyl-4,17[beta]- 20        dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 21    (lvi) oxymetholone (17[alpha]-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene- 22        17[beta]-hydroxy-(5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 23    (lvii) stanozolol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 24        (5[alpha]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole), 25    (lviii) stenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl- 26        (5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one),   SB3221- 7 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    (lix) testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17- 2        secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic 3        acid lactone), 4    (lx) testosterone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost- 5        4-en-3-one), 6    (lxi) tetrahydrogestrinone (13[beta], 17[alpha]- 7        diethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon- 8        4,9,11-trien-3-one), 9    (lxii) trenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4,9, 10        11-trien-3-one). 11    Any person who is otherwise lawfully in possession of an 12anabolic steroid, or who otherwise lawfully manufactures, 13distributes, dispenses, delivers, or possesses with intent to 14deliver an anabolic steroid, which anabolic steroid is 15expressly intended for and lawfully allowed to be administered 16through implants to livestock or other nonhuman species, and 17which is approved by the Secretary of Health and Human 18Services for such administration, and which the person intends 19to administer or have administered through such implants, 20shall not be considered to be in unauthorized possession or to 21unlawfully manufacture, distribute, dispense, deliver, or 22possess with intent to deliver such anabolic steroid for 23purposes of this Act. 24    (d) "Administration" means the Drug Enforcement 25Administration, United States Department of Justice, or its 26successor agency.   SB3221- 8 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    (d-5) "Clinical Director, Prescription Monitoring Program" 2means a Department of Human Services administrative employee 3licensed to either prescribe or dispense controlled substances 4who shall run the clinical aspects of the Department of Human 5Services Prescription Monitoring Program and its Prescription 6Information Library.7    (d-10) "Compounding" means the preparation and mixing of 8components, excluding flavorings, (1) as the result of a 9prescriber's prescription drug order or initiative based on 10the prescriber-patient-pharmacist relationship in the course 11of professional practice or (2) for the purpose of, or 12incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not 13for sale or dispensing. "Compounding" includes the preparation 14of drugs or devices in anticipation of receiving prescription 15drug orders based on routine, regularly observed dispensing 16patterns. Commercially available products may be compounded 17for dispensing to individual patients only if both of the 18following conditions are met: (i) the commercial product is 19not reasonably available from normal distribution channels in 20a timely manner to meet the patient's needs and (ii) the 21prescribing practitioner has requested that the drug be 22compounded. 23    (e) "Control" means to add a drug or other substance, or 24immediate precursor, to a Schedule whether by transfer from 25another Schedule or otherwise. 26    (f) "Controlled Substance" means (i) a drug, substance,   SB3221- 9 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1immediate precursor, or synthetic drug in the Schedules of 2Article II of this Act or (ii) a drug or other substance, or 3immediate precursor, designated as a controlled substance by 4the Department through administrative rule. The term does not 5include distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco, 6as those terms are defined or used in the Liquor Control Act of 71934 and the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995. 8    (f-5) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance:9        (1) the chemical structure of which is substantially 10    similar to the chemical structure of a controlled 11    substance in Schedule I or II;12        (2) which has a stimulant, depressant, or 13    hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that 14    is substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, 15    depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central 16    nervous system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or 17    II; or18        (3) with respect to a particular person, which such 19    person represents or intends to have a stimulant, 20    depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central 21    nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater 22    than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect 23    on the central nervous system of a controlled substance in 24    Schedule I or II. 25    (g) "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance, 26which, or the container or labeling of which, without   SB3221- 10 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1authorization bears the trademark, trade name, or other 2identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness 3thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other 4than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed, or 5dispensed the substance. 6    (h) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive 7or attempted transfer of possession of a controlled substance, 8with or without consideration, whether or not there is an 9agency relationship. "Deliver" or "delivery" does not include 10the donation of drugs to the extent permitted under the 11Illinois Drug Reuse Opportunity Program Act. 12    (i) "Department" means the Illinois Department of Human 13Services (as successor to the Department of Alcoholism and 14Substance Abuse) or its successor agency. 15    (j) (Blank). 16    (k) "Department of Corrections" means the Department of 17Corrections of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 18    (l) "Department of Financial and Professional Regulation" 19means the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 20of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 21    (m) "Depressant" means any drug that (i) causes an overall 22depression of central nervous system functions, (ii) causes 23impaired consciousness and awareness, and (iii) can be 24habit-forming or lead to a substance misuse or substance use 25disorder, including, but not limited to, alcohol, cannabis and 26its active principles and their analogs, benzodiazepines and   SB3221- 11 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1their analogs, barbiturates and their analogs, opioids 2(natural and synthetic) and their analogs, and chloral hydrate 3and similar sedative hypnotics. 4    (n) (Blank). 5    (o) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State 6Police or his or her designated agents. 7    (p) "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to 8an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the 9lawful order of a prescriber, including the prescribing, 10administering, packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary 11to prepare the substance for that delivery. 12    (q) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses. 13    (r) "Distribute" means to deliver, other than by 14administering or dispensing, a controlled substance. 15    (s) "Distributor" means a person who distributes. 16    (t) "Drug" means (1) substances recognized as drugs in the 17official United States Pharmacopoeia, Official Homeopathic 18Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National 19Formulary, or any supplement to any of them; (2) substances 20intended for use in diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or 21prevention of disease in man or animals; (3) substances (other 22than food) intended to affect the structure of any function of 23the body of man or animals and (4) substances intended for use 24as a component of any article specified in clause (1), (2), or 25(3) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their 26components, parts, or accessories.   SB3221- 12 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    (t-3) "Electronic health record" or "EHR" means an 2electronic record of health-related information on an 3individual that is created, gathered, managed, and consulted 4by authorized health care clinicians and staff. 5    (t-3.5) "Electronic health record system" or "EHR system" 6means any computer-based system or combination of federally 7certified Health IT Modules (defined at 42 CFR 170.102 or its 8successor) used as a repository for electronic health records 9and accessed or updated by a prescriber or authorized 10surrogate in the ordinary course of his or her medical 11practice. For purposes of connecting to the Prescription 12Information Library maintained by the Bureau of Pharmacy and 13Clinical Support Systems or its successor, an EHR system may 14connect to the Prescription Information Library directly or 15through all or part of a computer program or system that is a 16federally certified Health IT Module maintained by a third 17party and used by the EHR system to secure access to the 18database.19    (t-4) "Emergency medical services personnel" has the 20meaning ascribed to it in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 21Systems Act.22    (t-5) "Euthanasia agency" means an entity certified by the 23Department of Financial and Professional Regulation for the 24purpose of animal euthanasia that holds an animal control 25facility license or animal shelter license under the Animal 26Welfare Act. A euthanasia agency is authorized to purchase,   SB3221- 13 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1store, possess, and utilize Schedule II nonnarcotic and 2Schedule III nonnarcotic drugs for the sole purpose of animal 3euthanasia. 4    (t-10) "Euthanasia drugs" means Schedule II or Schedule 5III substances (nonnarcotic controlled substances) that are 6used by a euthanasia agency for the purpose of animal 7euthanasia. 8    (u) "Good faith" means the prescribing or dispensing of a 9controlled substance by a practitioner in the regular course 10of professional treatment to or for any person who is under his 11or her treatment for a pathology or condition other than that 12individual's physical or psychological dependence upon a 13controlled substance, except as provided herein: and 14application of the term to a pharmacist shall mean the 15dispensing of a controlled substance pursuant to the 16prescriber's order which in the professional judgment of the 17pharmacist is lawful. The pharmacist shall be guided by 18accepted professional standards, including, but not limited 19to, the following, in making the judgment: 20        (1) lack of consistency of prescriber-patient 21    relationship, 22        (2) frequency of prescriptions for same drug by one 23    prescriber for large numbers of patients, 24        (3) quantities beyond those normally prescribed, 25        (4) unusual dosages (recognizing that there may be 26    clinical circumstances where more or less than the usual   SB3221- 14 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    dose may be used legitimately), 2        (5) unusual geographic distances between patient, 3    pharmacist and prescriber, 4        (6) consistent prescribing of habit-forming drugs. 5    (u-0.5) "Hallucinogen" means a drug that causes markedly 6altered sensory perception leading to hallucinations of any 7type. 8    (u-1) "Home infusion services" means services provided by 9a pharmacy in compounding solutions for direct administration 10to a patient in a private residence, long-term care facility, 11or hospice setting by means of parenteral, intravenous, 12intramuscular, subcutaneous, or intraspinal infusion. 13    (u-5) "Illinois State Police" means the Illinois State 14Police or its successor agency. 15    (v) "Immediate precursor" means a substance: 16        (1) which the Department has found to be and by rule 17    designated as being a principal compound used, or produced 18    primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled 19    substance; 20        (2) which is an immediate chemical intermediary used 21    or likely to be used in the manufacture of such controlled 22    substance; and 23        (3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, 24    curtail or limit the manufacture of such controlled 25    substance. 26    (w) "Instructional activities" means the acts of teaching,   SB3221- 15 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1educating or instructing by practitioners using controlled 2substances within educational facilities approved by the State 3Board of Education or its successor agency. 4    (w-1) "Isomer" means optical isomer, unless specifically 5detailed in this Act. 6    (x) "Local authorities" means a duly organized State, 7County or Municipal peace unit or police force. 8    (y) "Look-alike substance" means a substance, other than a 9controlled substance which (1) by overall dosage unit 10appearance, including shape, color, size, markings or lack 11thereof, taste, consistency, or any other identifying physical 12characteristic of the substance, would lead a reasonable 13person to believe that the substance is a controlled 14substance, or (2) is expressly or impliedly represented to be 15a controlled substance or is distributed under circumstances 16which would lead a reasonable person to believe that the 17substance is a controlled substance. For the purpose of 18determining whether the representations made or the 19circumstances of the distribution would lead a reasonable 20person to believe the substance to be a controlled substance 21under this clause (2) of subsection (y), the court or other 22authority may consider the following factors in addition to 23any other factor that may be relevant: 24        (a) statements made by the owner or person in control 25    of the substance concerning its nature, use or effect; 26        (b) statements made to the buyer or recipient that the   SB3221- 16 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    substance may be resold for profit; 2        (c) whether the substance is packaged in a manner 3    normally used for the illegal distribution of controlled 4    substances; 5        (d) whether the distribution or attempted distribution 6    included an exchange of or demand for money or other 7    property as consideration, and whether the amount of the 8    consideration was substantially greater than the 9    reasonable retail market value of the substance. 10    Clause (1) of this subsection (y) shall not apply to a 11noncontrolled substance in its finished dosage form that was 12initially introduced into commerce prior to the initial 13introduction into commerce of a controlled substance in its 14finished dosage form which it may substantially resemble. 15    Nothing in this subsection (y) prohibits the dispensing or 16distributing of noncontrolled substances by persons authorized 17to dispense and distribute controlled substances under this 18Act, provided that such action would be deemed to be carried 19out in good faith under subsection (u) if the substances 20involved were controlled substances. 21    Nothing in this subsection (y) or in this Act prohibits 22the manufacture, preparation, propagation, compounding, 23processing, packaging, advertising or distribution of a drug 24or drugs by any person registered pursuant to Section 510 of 25the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 360). 26    (y-1) "Mail-order pharmacy" means a pharmacy that is   SB3221- 17 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1located in a state of the United States that delivers, 2dispenses or distributes, through the United States Postal 3Service or other common carrier, to Illinois residents, any 4substance which requires a prescription. 5    (z) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, 6propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a 7controlled substance other than methamphetamine, either 8directly or indirectly, by extraction from substances of 9natural origin, or independently by means of chemical 10synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 11synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the 12substance or labeling of its container, except that this term 13does not include: 14        (1) by an ultimate user, the preparation or 15    compounding of a controlled substance for his or her own 16    use; 17        (2) by a practitioner, or his or her authorized agent 18    under his or her supervision, the preparation, 19    compounding, packaging, or labeling of a controlled 20    substance: 21            (a) as an incident to his or her administering or 22        dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of 23        his or her professional practice; or 24            (b) as an incident to lawful research, teaching or 25        chemical analysis and not for sale; or 26        (3) the packaging, repackaging, or labeling of drugs   SB3221- 18 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    only to the extent permitted under the Illinois Drug Reuse 2    Opportunity Program Act. 3    (z-1) (Blank). 4    (z-5) "Medication shopping" means the conduct prohibited 5under subsection (a) of Section 314.5 of this Act.6    (z-10) "Mid-level practitioner" means (i) a physician 7assistant who has been delegated authority to prescribe 8through a written delegation of authority by a physician 9licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches, in 10accordance with Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant 11Practice Act of 1987, (ii) an advanced practice registered 12nurse who has been delegated authority to prescribe through a 13written delegation of authority by a physician licensed to 14practice medicine in all of its branches or by a podiatric 15physician, in accordance with Section 65-40 of the Nurse 16Practice Act, (iii) an advanced practice registered nurse 17certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical 18nurse specialist who has been granted authority to prescribe 19by a hospital affiliate in accordance with Section 65-45 of 20the Nurse Practice Act, (iv) an animal euthanasia agency, or 21(v) a prescribing psychologist. 22    (aa) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether 23produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances 24of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical 25synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 26synthesis:   SB3221- 19 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (1) opium, opiates, derivatives of opium and opiates, 2    including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts 3    of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of 4    such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within 5    the specific chemical designation; however the term 6    "narcotic drug" does not include the isoquinoline 7    alkaloids of opium; 8        (2) (blank); 9        (3) opium poppy and poppy straw; 10        (4) coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of 11    coca leaves from which substantially all of the cocaine 12    and ecgonine, and their isomers, derivatives and salts, 13    have been removed; 14        (5) cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, 15    and salts of isomers;16        (6) ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, 17    and salts of isomers;18        (7) any compound, mixture, or preparation which 19    contains any quantity of any of the substances referred to 20    in subparagraphs (1) through (6). 21    (bb) "Nurse" means a registered nurse licensed under the 22Nurse Practice Act. 23    (cc) (Blank). 24    (dd) "Opiate" means a drug derived from or related to 25opium. 26    (ee) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver   SB3221- 20 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1somniferum L., except its seeds. 2    (ee-5) "Oral dosage" means a tablet, capsule, elixir, or 3solution or other liquid form of medication intended for 4administration by mouth, but the term does not include a form 5of medication intended for buccal, sublingual, or transmucosal 6administration. 7    (ff) "Parole and Pardon Board" means the Parole and Pardon 8Board of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 9    (gg) "Person" means any individual, corporation, 10mail-order pharmacy, government or governmental subdivision or 11agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or 12association, or any other entity. 13    (hh) "Pharmacist" means any person who holds a license or 14certificate of registration as a registered pharmacist, a 15local registered pharmacist or a registered assistant 16pharmacist under the Pharmacy Practice Act. 17    (ii) "Pharmacy" means any store, ship or other place in 18which pharmacy is authorized to be practiced under the 19Pharmacy Practice Act. 20    (ii-5) "Pharmacy shopping" means the conduct prohibited 21under subsection (b) of Section 314.5 of this Act.22    (ii-10) "Physician" (except when the context otherwise 23requires) means a person licensed to practice medicine in all 24of its branches. 25    (jj) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of 26the opium poppy, after mowing.   SB3221- 21 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    (kk) "Practitioner" means a physician licensed to practice 2medicine in all its branches, dentist, optometrist, podiatric 3physician, veterinarian, scientific investigator, pharmacist, 4physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, 5licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, emergency medical 6services personnel, hospital, laboratory, or pharmacy, or 7other person licensed, registered, or otherwise lawfully 8permitted by the United States or this State to distribute, 9dispense, conduct research with respect to, administer or use 10in teaching or chemical analysis, a controlled substance in 11the course of professional practice or research. 12    (ll) "Pre-printed prescription" means a written 13prescription upon which the designated drug has been indicated 14prior to the time of issuance; the term does not mean a written 15prescription that is individually generated by machine or 16computer in the prescriber's office. 17    (mm) "Prescriber" means a physician licensed to practice 18medicine in all its branches, dentist, optometrist, 19prescribing psychologist licensed under Section 4.2 of the 20Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act with prescriptive 21authority delegated under Section 4.3 of the Clinical 22Psychologist Licensing Act, podiatric physician, or 23veterinarian who issues a prescription, a physician assistant 24who issues a prescription for a controlled substance in 25accordance with Section 303.05, a written delegation, and a 26written collaborative agreement required under Section 7.5 of   SB3221- 22 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, an advanced 2practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority 3delegated under Section 65-40 of the Nurse Practice Act and in 4accordance with Section 303.05, a written delegation, and a 5written collaborative agreement under Section 65-35 of the 6Nurse Practice Act, an advanced practice registered nurse 7certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical 8nurse specialist who has been granted authority to prescribe 9by a hospital affiliate in accordance with Section 65-45 of 10the Nurse Practice Act and in accordance with Section 303.05, 11or an advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 12practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who 13has full practice authority pursuant to Section 65-43 of the 14Nurse Practice Act. 15    (nn) "Prescription" means a written, facsimile, or oral 16order, or an electronic order that complies with applicable 17federal requirements, of a physician licensed to practice 18medicine in all its branches, dentist, podiatric physician or 19veterinarian for any controlled substance, of an optometrist 20in accordance with Section 15.1 of the Illinois Optometric 21Practice Act of 1987, of a prescribing psychologist licensed 22under Section 4.2 of the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act 23with prescriptive authority delegated under Section 4.3 of the 24Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, of a physician assistant 25for a controlled substance in accordance with Section 303.05, 26a written delegation, and a written collaborative agreement   SB3221- 23 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1required under Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant Practice 2Act of 1987, of an advanced practice registered nurse with 3prescriptive authority delegated under Section 65-40 of the 4Nurse Practice Act who issues a prescription for a controlled 5substance in accordance with Section 303.05, a written 6delegation, and a written collaborative agreement under 7Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice Act, of an advanced 8practice registered nurse certified as a nurse practitioner, 9nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who has been 10granted authority to prescribe by a hospital affiliate in 11accordance with Section 65-45 of the Nurse Practice Act and in 12accordance with Section 303.05 when required by law, or of an 13advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 14practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who 15has full practice authority pursuant to Section 65-43 of the 16Nurse Practice Act. 17    (nn-5) "Prescription Information Library" (PIL) means an 18electronic library that contains reported controlled substance 19data.20    (nn-10) "Prescription Monitoring Program" (PMP) means the 21entity that collects, tracks, and stores reported data on 22controlled substances and select drugs pursuant to Section 23316. 24    (oo) "Production" or "produce" means manufacture, 25planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled 26substance other than methamphetamine.   SB3221- 24 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    (pp) "Registrant" means every person who is required to 2register under Section 302 of this Act. 3    (qq) "Registry number" means the number assigned to each 4person authorized to handle controlled substances under the 5laws of the United States and of this State. 6    (qq-5) "Secretary" means, as the context requires, either 7the Secretary of the Department or the Secretary of the 8Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, and the 9Secretary's designated agents. 10    (rr) "State" includes the State of Illinois and any state, 11district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, 12and any area subject to the legal authority of the United 13States of America. 14    (rr-5) "Stimulant" means any drug that (i) causes an 15overall excitation of central nervous system functions, (ii) 16causes impaired consciousness and awareness, and (iii) can be 17habit-forming or lead to a substance use disorder, including, 18but not limited to, amphetamines and their analogs, 19methylphenidate and its analogs, cocaine, and phencyclidine 20and its analogs. 21    (rr-10) "Synthetic drug" includes, but is not limited to, 22any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any synthetic 23cathinones as provided for in Schedule I. 24    (ss) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses 25a controlled substance for his or her own use or for the use of 26a member of his or her household or for administering to an   SB3221- 25 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1animal owned by him or her or by a member of his or her 2household. 3(Source: P.A. 102-389, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 4102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.) 5    (720 ILCS 570/204)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1204)6    Sec. 204. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 7Section are included in Schedule I.8    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 9another schedule, any of the following opiates, including 10their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, 11esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of such isomers, 12esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific 13chemical designation:14        (1) Acetylmethadol;15        (1.1) (Blank); Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl16    (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)- 17    4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);18        (2) Allylprodine;19        (3) Alphacetylmethadol, except 20    levo-alphacetylmethadol (also known as levo-alpha- 21    acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM);22        (4) Alphameprodine;23        (5) Alphamethadol;24        (6) Alpha-methylfentanyl 25    (N-(1-alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl) SB3221- 26 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    propionanilide;  1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N- 2    propanilido) piperidine;3        (6.1) (Blank); Alpha-methylthiofentanyl 4    (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl- 5    4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);6        (7) 1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine (MPPP);7        (7.1) PEPAP 8    (1-(2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);9        (8) Benzethidine;10        (9) Betacetylmethadol;11        (9.1) (Blank); Beta-hydroxyfentanyl 12    (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)- 13    4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);14        (10) Betameprodine;15        (11) Betamethadol;16        (12) Betaprodine;17        (12.1) Brorphine; 18        (13) Clonitazene;19        (14) Dextromoramide;20        (15) Diampromide;21        (16) Diethylthiambutene;22        (17) Difenoxin;23        (18) Dimenoxadol;24        (19) Dimepheptanol;25        (20) Dimethylthiambutene;26        (21) Dioxaphetylbutyrate;  SB3221- 27 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (22) Dipipanone;2        (23) Ethylmethylthiambutene;3        (24) Etonitazene;4        (25) Etoxeridine;5        (25.1) Flunitazene; 6        (26) Furethidine;7        (27) Hydroxpethidine;8        (27.1) Isotonitazene; 9        (28) Ketobemidone;10        (29) Levomoramide;11        (30) Levophenacylmorphan;12        (31) (Blank); 3-Methylfentanyl 13    (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)- 14    4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);15        (31.1) (Blank); 3-Methylthiofentanyl 16    (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl- 17    4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);18        (31.2) Metonitazene; 19        (32) Morpheridine;20        (33) Noracymethadol;21        (34) Norlevorphanol;22        (35) Normethadone;23        (36) Norpipanone;24        (36.1) (Blank); Para-fluorofentanyl 25    (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)- 26    4-piperidinyl]propanamide);  SB3221- 28 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (37) Phenadoxone;2        (38) Phenampromide;3        (39) Phenomorphan;4        (40) Phenoperidine;5        (41) Piritramide;6        (42) Proheptazine;7        (43) Properidine;8        (44) Propiram;9        (45) Racemoramide;10        (45.1) (Blank); Thiofentanyl 11    (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl- 12    4-piperidinyl]-propanamide);13        (46) Tilidine;14        (47) Trimeperidine;15        (48) (Blank); Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (other 16name: 17    N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]- 18    N-phenylpropanamide);19        (49) (Blank); Furanyl fentanyl (FU-F);20        (50) (Blank); Butyryl fentanyl;21        (51) (Blank); Valeryl fentanyl;22        (52) (Blank); Acetyl fentanyl;23        (53) (Blank); Beta-hydroxy-thiofentanyl; 24        (54) 3,4-dichloro-N-[2- 25    (dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N- 26    methylbenzamide (U-47700);   SB3221- 29 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (55) 4-chloro-N-[1-[2- 2    (4-nitrophenyl)ethyl]-2-piperidinylidene]- 3    benzenesulfonamide (W-18); 4        (56) 4-chloro-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl) 5    -2-piperidinylidene]-benzenesulfonamide (W-15); 6        (57) (Blank). acrylfentanyl (acryloylfentanyl). 7    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 8another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, its 9salts, isomers and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of 10such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within 11the specific chemical designation:12        (1) Acetorphine;13        (2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;14        (3) Benzylmorphine;15        (4) Codeine methylbromide;16        (5) Codeine-N-Oxide;17        (6) Cyprenorphine;18        (7) Desomorphine;19        (8) Diacetyldihydromorphine (Dihydroheroin);20        (9) Dihydromorphine;21        (10) Drotebanol;22        (11) Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);23        (12) Heroin;24        (13) Hydromorphinol;25        (14) Methyldesorphine;26        (15) Methyldihydromorphine;  SB3221- 30 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (16) Morphine methylbromide;2        (17) Morphine methylsulfonate;3        (18) Morphine-N-Oxide;4        (19) Myrophine;5        (20) Nicocodeine;6        (21) Nicomorphine;7        (22) Normorphine;8        (23) Pholcodine;9        (24) Thebacon.10    (d) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 11another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 12preparation which contains any quantity of the following 13hallucinogenic substances, or which contains any of its salts, 14isomers and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such 15salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the 16specific chemical designation (for the purposes of this 17paragraph only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, 18position and geometric isomers):19        (1) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine 20    (alpha-methyl,3,4-methylenedioxyphenethylamine, 21    methylenedioxyamphetamine, MDA);22        (1.1) Alpha-ethyltryptamine23    (some trade or other names: etryptamine;24    MONASE; alpha-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine;25    3-(2-aminobutyl)indole; a-ET; and AET);26        (2) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);  SB3221- 31 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (2.1) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine 2    (also known as: N-ethyl-alpha-methyl- 3    3,4(methylenedioxy) Phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, 4    and MDEA);5        (2.2) (Blank); N-Benzylpiperazine (BZP); 6        (2.2-1) (Blank); Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine 7    (TFMPP); 8        (3) 3-methoxy-4,5-methylenedioxyamphetamine, (MMDA);9        (4) 3,4,5-trimethoxyamphetamine (TMA);10        (5) (Blank);11        (6) Diethyltryptamine (DET);12        (7) Dimethyltryptamine (DMT);13        (7.1) 5-Methoxy-diallyltryptamine; 14        (8) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine (DOM, STP);15        (9) Ibogaine  (some trade and other names: 16    7-ethyl-6,6,beta,7,8,9,10,12,13-octahydro-2-methoxy- 17    6,9-methano-5H-pyrido [1',2':1,2] azepino [5,4-b] 18    indole; Tabernanthe iboga);19        (10) Lysergic acid diethylamide;20        (10.1) Salvinorin A; 21        (10.5) Salvia divinorum (meaning all parts of the 22    plant presently classified botanically as Salvia 23    divinorum, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any 24    extract from any part of that plant, and every compound, 25    manufacture, salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever 26    the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers   SB3221- 32 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    is possible within the specific chemical designation, 2    derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant, its 3    seeds or extracts); 4        (11) 3,4,5-trimethoxyphenethylamine (Mescaline);5        (12) Peyote (meaning all parts of the plant presently 6    classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, 7    whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract 8    from any part of that plant, and every compound, 9    manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of 10    that plant, its seeds or extracts);11        (13) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate (JB 318);12        (14) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;13        (14.1) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine 14    (also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl- 15    3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine and N-hydroxy MDA);16        (15) Parahexyl; some trade or other names: 17    3-hexyl-1-hydroxy-7,8,9,10-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6H- 18    dibenzo (b,d) pyran; Synhexyl;19        (16) Psilocybin;20        (17) Psilocyn;21        (18) Alpha-methyltryptamine (AMT);22        (19) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine 23    (2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA);24        (20) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine 25    (4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 26    4-bromo-2,5-DMA);  SB3221- 33 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (20.1) 4-Bromo-2,5 dimethoxyphenethylamine. 2    Some trade or other names: 2-(4-bromo- 3    2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; 4    alpha-desmethyl DOB, 2CB, Nexus;5        (21) 4-methoxyamphetamine 6    (4-methoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 7    paramethoxyamphetamine; PMA);8        (22) (Blank);9        (23) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine. 10    Some trade or other names: 11    N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, 12    (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, 13    N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;14        (24) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine. Some trade 15    or other names: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) pyrrolidine, PCPy, 16    PHP;17        (25) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;18        (26) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine 19    (another name: DOET);20        (27) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl] pyrrolidine 21    (another name: TCPy);22        (28) (Blank);23        (29) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine (some trade 24    or other names: 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine; 25    2-thienyl analog of phencyclidine; TPCP; TCP);26        (29.1) Benzothiophene analog of phencyclidine. Some   SB3221- 34 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    trade or other names: BTCP or benocyclidine;2        (29.2) 3-Methoxyphencyclidine (3-MeO-PCP); 3        (30) Bufotenine (some trade or other names: 4    3-(Beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole; 5    3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; 6    5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; 7    N,N-dimethylserotonin; mappine);8        (31) (Blank);  9        (32) (Blank);  10        (33) (Blank);  11        (34) (Blank); 12        (34.5) (Blank);  13        (35) (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-14    (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7, 15    10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol16    Some trade or other names: HU-210; 17        (35.5)  (6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6- 18    dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a- 19    tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol, its isomers,  20    salts, and salts of isomers; Some trade or other  21    names: HU-210, Dexanabinol; 22        (36) Dexanabinol, (6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-23    6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)- 24    6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol25    Some trade or other names: HU-211;26        (37) (Blank);   SB3221- 35 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (38) (Blank); 2        (39) (Blank); 3        (40) (Blank); 4        (41) (Blank); 5        (42) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 6    3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or 7    1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at the 8    nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 9    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 10    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 11    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted 12    in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 13    substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples 14    of this structural class include, but are not limited to, 15    JWH-018, AM-2201, JWH-175, JWH-184, and JWH-185;16        (43) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 17    3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the nitrogen 18    atom of the pyrrole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 19    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 20    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 21    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 22    in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not 23    substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples 24    of this structural class include, but are not limited to, 25    JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-307, and JWH-368; 26        (44) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from   SB3221- 36 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at the 2    3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 3    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 4    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 5    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted 6    in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not 7    substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples 8    of this structural class include, but are not limited to, 9    JWH-176; 10        (45) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 11    3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at the nitrogen atom 12    of the indole ring with alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 13    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 14    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 15    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 16    in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 17    substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of 18    this structural class include, but are not limited to, 19    JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and RCS-8; 20        (46) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 21    2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution at the 22    5-position of the phenolic ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 23    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 24    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 25    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not substituted in the 26    cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural   SB3221- 37 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    class include, but are not limited to, CP 47, 497 and its 2    C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol); 3        (46.1) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 4    3-(benzoyl) indole with substitution at the nitrogen atom 5    of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 6    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 7    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 8    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further 9    substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether 10    or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. 11    Examples of this structural class include, but are not 12    limited to, AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, Pravadoline (WIN 13    48,098), and RCS-4; 14        (47) (Blank); 15        (48) (Blank); 16        (49) (Blank); 17        (50) (Blank); 18        (51) (Blank); 19        (52) (Blank); 20        (53) 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthio-phenethylamine. 21    Some trade or other names: 2C-T-7; 22        (53.1) 4-ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some 23    trade or other names: 2C-E; 24        (53.2) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine. Some 25    trade or other names: 2C-D; 26        (53.3) 4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some   SB3221- 38 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    trade or other names: 2C-C; 2        (53.4) 4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some trade 3    or other names: 2C-I; 4        (53.5) 4-ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some 5    trade or other names: 2C-T-2; 6        (53.6) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-isopropylthio-phenethylamine. 7    Some trade or other names: 2C-T-4; 8        (53.7) 2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some trade or 9    other names: 2C-H; 10        (53.8) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine. Some 11    trade or other names: 2C-N; 12        (53.9) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenethylamine. Some 13    trade or other names: 2C-P; 14        (53.10) 2,5-dimethoxy-3,4-dimethylphenethylamine. 15    Some trade or other names: 2C-G; 16        (53.11) The N-(2-methoxybenzyl) derivative of any 2C 17    phenethylamine referred to in subparagraphs (20.1), (53), 18    (53.1), (53.2), (53.3), (53.4), (53.5), (53.6), (53.7), 19    (53.8), (53.9), and (53.10) including, but not limited to, 20    25I-NBOMe and 25C-NBOMe; 21        (54) 5-Methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine; 22        (55) (Blank); 23        (56) (Blank); 24        (57) (Blank); 25        (58) (Blank); 26        (59) (Blank); 3-cyclopropoylindole with substitution   SB3221- 39 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, 2    haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 3    aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 4    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 5    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 6    on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 7    substituted on the cyclopropyl ring to any extent: 8    including, but not limited to, XLR11, UR144, FUB-144; 9        (60) (Blank); 3-adamantoylindole with substitution at 10    the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 11    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 12    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 13    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 14    on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 15    substituted on the adamantyl ring to any extent: 16    including, but not limited to, AB-001; 17        (61) (Blank); N-(adamantyl)-indole-3-carboxamide with 18    substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by 19    alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 20    cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 21    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 22    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 23    on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 24    substituted on the adamantyl ring to any extent: 25    including, but not limited to, APICA/2NE-1, STS-135; 26        (62) (Blank); N-(adamantyl)-indazole-3-carboxamide   SB3221- 40 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    with substitution at a nitrogen atom of the indazole ring 2    by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 3    cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 4    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 5    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 6    on the indazole ring to any extent, whether or not 7    substituted on the adamantyl ring to any extent: 8    including, but not limited to, AKB48, 5F-AKB48; 9        (63) (Blank); 1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 10    8-quinolinyl ester with substitution at the nitrogen atom 11    of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 12    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 13    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 14    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 15    on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 16    substituted on the quinoline ring to any extent: 17    including, but not limited to, PB22, 5F-PB22, FUB-PB-22; 18        (64) (Blank); 3-(1-naphthoyl)indazole with 19    substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by 20    alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 21    cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 22    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 23    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 24    on the indazole ring to any extent, whether or not 25    substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent: including, 26    but not limited to, THJ-018, THJ-2201;   SB3221- 41 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (65) (Blank); 2-(1-naphthoyl)benzimidazole with 2    substitution at the nitrogen atom of the benzimidazole 3    ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 4    cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 5    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 6    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 7    on the benzimidazole ring to any extent, whether or not 8    substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent: including, 9    but not limited to, FUBIMINA; 10        (66) (Blank); N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)- 11    1H-indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 12    nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 13    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 14    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 15    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 16    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 17    limited to, AB-PINACA, AB-FUBINACA, AB-CHMINACA; 18        (67) (Blank); N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan- 19    2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 20    nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 21    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 22    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 23    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 24    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 25    limited to, ADB-PINACA, ADB-FUBINACA; 26        (68) (Blank); N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-   SB3221- 42 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    2-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 2    nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 3    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 4    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 5    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 6    on the indole ring to any extent: including, but not 7    limited to, ADBICA, 5F-ADBICA; 8        (69) (Blank); N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2 -9    yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 10    nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 11    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 12    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 13    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 14    on the indole ring to any extent: including, but not 15    limited to, ABICA, 5F-ABICA; 16        (70) (Blank); Methyl 2-(1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3- 17    methylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen atom of 18    the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 19    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 20    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 21    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 22    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 23    limited to, AMB, 5F-AMB; 24        (71) (Blank); Methyl 2-(1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)- 25    3,3-dimethylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen 26    atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,   SB3221- 43 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 2    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 3    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 4    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 5    limited to, 5-fluoro-MDMB-PINACA, MDMB-FUBINACA; 6        (72) (Blank); Methyl 2-(1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3- 7    methylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen atom of 8    the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 9    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 10    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 11    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 12    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 13    limited to, MMB018, MMB2201, and AMB-CHMICA; 14        (73) (Blank); Methyl 2-(1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3- 15    dimethylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen atom 16    of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 17    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 18    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 19    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 20    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 21    limited to, MDMB-CHMICA; 22        (74) (Blank); N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan- 23    2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 24    nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 25    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 26    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or   SB3221- 44 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 2    on the indazole ring to any     extent: including, but not 3    limited to, APP-CHMINACA, 5-fluoro-APP-PINACA; 4        (75) (Blank); N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan- 5    2-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 6    nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 7    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 8    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 9    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 10    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 11    limited to, APP-PICA and 5-fluoro-APP-PICA; 12        (76) 4-Acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine: trade name 13    4-AcO-DMT;14        (77) 5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine: trade 15    name 5-MeO-MIPT;16        (78) 4-hydroxy Diethyltryptamine (4-HO-DET);17        (79) 4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine (4-HO-MET);18        (80) 4-hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (4-HO-DiPT);19        (81) 4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine 20    (4-HO-MiPT); 21        (82) (Blank); Fluorophenylpiperazine;22        (83) Methoxetamine;23        (84) 1-(Ethylamino)-2-phenylpropan-2-one (iso- 24    ethcathinone). 25    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 26another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or   SB3221- 45 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1preparation which contains any quantity of the following 2substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous 3system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers 4whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of 5isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:6        (1) mecloqualone;7        (2) methaqualone; and8        (3) gamma hydroxybutyric acid.9    (f) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 10another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 11preparation which contains any quantity of the following 12substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 13system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:14        (1) Fenethylline;15        (2) N-ethylamphetamine;16        (3) Aminorex (some other names: 17    2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; aminoxaphen; 18    4-5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine) and its 19    salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;20        (4) Methcathinone (some other names: 21    2-methylamino-1-phenylpropan-1-one; 22    Ephedrone; 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; 23    alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; N-methylcathinone; 24    methycathinone; Monomethylpropion; UR 1431) and its 25    salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;26        (5) Cathinone (some trade or other names: SB3221- 46 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    2-aminopropiophenone; alpha-aminopropiophenone; 2    2-amino-1-phenyl-propanone; norephedrone);3        (6) N,N-dimethylamphetamine (also known as: 4    N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; 5    N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine);6        (7) (+ or -) cis-4-methylaminorex  ((+ or -) cis- 7    4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-4-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);8        (8) 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV); 9        (9) Halogenated amphetamines and 10    methamphetamines - any compound derived from either 11    amphetamine or methamphetamine through the substitution 12    of a halogen on the phenyl ring, including, but not 13    limited to, 2-fluoroamphetamine, 3- 14    fluoroamphetamine and 4-fluoroamphetamine; 15        (10) Aminopropylbenzofuran (APB): 16    including 4-(2-Aminopropyl) benzofuran, 5- 17    (2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, 6-(2-Aminopropyl) 18    benzofuran, and 7-(2-Aminopropyl) benzofuran; 19        (11) Aminopropyldihydrobenzofuran (APDB): 20    including 4-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3- dihydrobenzofuran, 21    5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2, 3-dihydrobenzofuran, 22    6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran, 23    and 7-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran; 24        (12) Methylaminopropylbenzofuran 25    (MAPB): including 4-(2-methylaminopropyl) 26    benzofuran, 5-(2-methylaminopropyl)benzofuran, SB3221- 47 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    6-(2-methylaminopropyl)benzofuran 2    and 7-(2-methylaminopropyl)benzofuran; . 3        (13) Methylaminopropyldihydrobenzofuran 4    (MAPDB): including 1-(2,3-dihydrobenzofuran-5-yl)- 5    N-methylpropan-2-amine. 6    (g) Temporary listing of substances subject to emergency 7scheduling. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation 8that contains any quantity of the following substances:9        (1) N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide 10    (benzylfentanyl), its optical isomers, isomers, salts, and 11    salts of isomers;12        (2) N-[1(2-thienyl) methyl-4-piperidyl]-N- 13    phenylpropanamide (thenylfentanyl), its optical isomers, 14    salts, and salts of isomers.15    (h) Synthetic cathinones. Unless specifically excepted, 16any chemical compound which is not approved by the United 17States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is not 18dispensed or possessed in accordance with State or federal 19law, not including bupropion, structurally derived from 202-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with 21either phenyl, naphthyl, or thiophene ring systems, whether or 22not the compound is further modified in one or more of the 23following ways: 24        (1) by substitution in the ring system to any extent 25    with alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or 26    halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in   SB3221- 48 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    the ring system by one or more other univalent 2    substituents. Examples of this class include, but are not 3    limited to, 3,4-Methylenedioxycathinone (bk-MDA); 4        (2) by substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic 5    alkyl substituent. Examples of this class include, but are 6    not limited to, 2-methylamino-1-phenylbutan-1-one 7    (buphedrone); or 8        (3) by substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with 9    alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or methoxybenzyl groups, or by 10    inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic 11    structure. Examples of this class include, but are not 12    limited to, Dimethylcathinone, Ethcathinone, and 13    a-Pyrrolidinopropiophenone (a-PPP); or 14    Any other synthetic cathinone which is not approved by the 15United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is 16not dispensed or possessed in accordance with State or federal 17law. 18    (i) Synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines. Any synthetic 19cannabinoid or piperazine which is not approved by the United 20States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is 21not dispensed or possessed in accordance with State and 22federal law.23        (1) As used in this Section, "synthetic cannabinoid" 24    includes, but is not limited to, any compound, as 25    identified in a report from an accredited forensic 26    laboratory, that is structurally derived from any one or   SB3221- 49 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    more of the following compounds:2            (A) Any compound structurally derived from 3        3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or 4        1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at 5        the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, 6        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 7        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 8        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 9        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further 10        substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether 11        or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. 12        Examples of this structural class include, but are not 13        limited to, JWH-018, AM-2201, JWH-175, JWH-184, and 14        JWH-185;15            (B) 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the 16        nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 17        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 18        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 19        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 20        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 21        substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether 22        or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. 23        Examples of this structural class include, but are not 24        limited to, JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-307, and 25        JWH-368;26            (C) 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at   SB3221- 50 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        the 3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 2        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 3        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 4        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 5        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further 6        substituted in the indene ring to any extent, whether 7        or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. 8        Examples of this structural class include, but are not 9        limited to, JWH-176;10            (D) 3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at the 11        nitrogen atom of the indole ring with alkyl, 12        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 13        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 14        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 15        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 16        substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether 17        or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. 18        Examples of this structural class include, but are not 19        limited to, JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and RCS-8;20            (E) 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution 21        at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by alkyl, 22        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 23        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 24        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 25        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not substituted in 26        the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Examples of this   SB3221- 51 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        structural class include, but are not limited to, CP 2        47, 497 and its C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol);3            (F) 3-(benzoyl) indole with substitution at the 4        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, 5        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 6        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 7        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 8        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further 9        substituted in the indole ring to any extent and 10        whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any 11        extent. Examples of this structural class include, but 12        are not limited to, AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, 13        Pravadoline (WIN 48,098), and RCS-4;14            (G) 3-cyclopropoylindole with substitution at the 15        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 16        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 17        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 18        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 19        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 20        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, whether 21        or not substituted on the cyclopropyl ring to any 22        extent, including, but not limited to, XLR11, UR144, 23        FUB-144;24            (H) 3-adamantoylindole with substitution at the 25        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 26        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl   SB3221- 52 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 2        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 3        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 4        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, whether 5        or not substituted on the adamantyl ring to any 6        extent, including, but not limited to, AB-001;7            (I) N-(adamantyl)-indole-3-carboxamide with 8        substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring 9        by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 10        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 11        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 12        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 13        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, whether 14        or not substituted on the adamantyl ring to any 15        extent, including, but not limited to, APICA/2NE-1, 16        STS-135;17            (J) N-(adamantyl)-indazole-3-carboxamide with 18        substitution at a nitrogen atom of the indazole ring 19        by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 20        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 21        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 22        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 23        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 24        whether or not substituted on the adamantyl ring to 25        any extent, including, but not limited to, AKB48, 26        5F-AKB48;  SB3221- 53 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1            (K) 1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester 2        with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole 3        ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 4        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 5        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 6        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 7        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, whether 8        or not substituted on the quinoline ring to any 9        extent, including, but not limited to, PB22, 5F-PB22, 10        FUB-PB-22;11            (L) 3-(1-naphthoyl)indazole with substitution at 12        the nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 13        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 14        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 15        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 16        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 17        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 18        whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any 19        extent, including, but not limited to, THJ-018, 20        THJ-2201;21            (M) 2-(1-naphthoyl)benzimidazole with 22        substitution at the nitrogen atom of the benzimidazole 23        ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 24        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 25        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 26        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further   SB3221- 54 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        substituted on the benzimidazole ring to any extent, 2        whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any 3        extent, including, but not limited to, FUBIMINA;4            (N) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1H- 5        indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 6        nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 7        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 8        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 9        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 10        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 11        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 12        including, but not limited to, AB-PINACA, AB-FUBINACA, 13        AB-CHMINACA;14            (O) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)- 15        1H-indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 16        nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 17        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 18        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 19        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 20        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 21        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 22        including, but not limited to, ADB-PINACA, 23        ADB-FUBINACA;24            (P) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)- 25        1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 26        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl,   SB3221- 55 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 2        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 3        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 4        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 5        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, 6        including, but not limited to, ADBICA, 5F-ADBICA;7            (Q) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1H- 8        indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the nitrogen 9        atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 10        cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl 11        aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 12        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 13        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, 14        including, but not limited to, ABICA, 5F-ABICA;15            (R) Methyl 2-(1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)- 16        3-methylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen 17        atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 18        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 19        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 20        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 21        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 22        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 23        including, but not limited to, AMB, 5F-AMB;24            (S) Methyl 2-(1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)- 25        3,3-dimethylbutanoate with substitution on the 26        nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl,   SB3221- 56 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 2        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 3        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 4        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 5        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 6        including, but not limited to, 5-fluoro-MDMB-PINACA, 7        MDMB-FUBINACA;8            (T) Methyl 2-(1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3- 9        methylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen atom 10        of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 11        cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl 12        aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 13        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 14        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, 15        including, but not limited to, MMB018, MMB2201, and 16        AMB-CHMICA;17            (U) Methyl 2-(1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3- 18        dimethylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen 19        atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 20        cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl 21        aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 22        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 23        substituted on the indazole indole ring to any extent, 24        including, but not limited to, MDMB-CHMICA;25            (V) N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H- 26        indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the   SB3221- 57 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 2        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 3        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 4        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 5        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 6        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 7        including, but not limited to, APP-CHMINACA, 8        5-fluoro-APP-PINACA;9            (W) N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)- 10        1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 11        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 12        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 13        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 14        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 15        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 16        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, 17        including, but not limited to, APP-PICA and 18        5-fluoro-APP-PICA;19            (X) 1H-indazole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl 20        ester with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the 21        indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 22        cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl 23        aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 24        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 25        substituted on the inazdole ring to any extent, 26        whether or not substituted on the quinoline ring to   SB3221- 58 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        any extent, including, but not limited to, SDB-005, 2        5-F-SDB-005;3        (2) As used in this Section, "synthetic piperazine" 4    includes, but is not limited to, any of the following 5    compounds and their positional isomers:6            (A) N-Benzylpiperazine (BZP);7            (B) Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine (TFMPP);8            (C) Fluorophenylpiperazine;9            (D) Chlorophenylpiperazine. 10    (j) Unless specifically excepted or listed in another 11schedule, any chemical compound which is not approved by the 12United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is 13not dispensed or possessed in accordance with State or federal 14law, and is derived from the following structural classes and 15their salts:16        (1) Benzodiazepine class: A fused 1,4-diazepine and 17    benzene ring structure with a phenyl connected to the 18    1,4-diazepine ring, with any substitution(s) or 19    replacement(s) on the 1,4-diazepine or benzene ring, any 20    substitution(s) on the phenyl ring, or any combination 21    thereof. Examples of this class include but are not 22    limited to: Clonazolam, Flualprazolam; or23        (2) Thienodiazepine class: A fused 1,4-diazepine and 24    thiophene ring structure with a phenyl connected to the 25    1,4-diazepine ring, with any substitution(s) or 26    replacement(s) on the 1,4-diazepine or thiophene ring, any   SB3221- 59 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    substitution(s) on the phenyl ring, or any combination 2    thereof. Examples of this class include but are not 3    limited to: Etizolam. 4    (k) Fentanyl-related substances.5        (1) As used in this Section, "fentanyl-related 6    substance" means any compound, as identified in a report 7    from an accredited forensic laboratory, unless 8    specifically excepted or listed under another schedule, 9    that is not approved by the United States Food and Drug 10    Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or 11    possessed in accordance with State or federal law and that 12    is structurally derived from fentanyl 13    (N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)- 14    propanamide) by one or more of the following 15    modifications:16            (A) replacement of the phenyl portion of the 17        phenethyl group by any monocycle, whether or not 18        further substituted in or on the monocycle;19            (B) substitution in or on the phenethyl group with 20        alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, 21        amino, or nitro groups;22            (C) substitution in or on the piperidine ring with 23        alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, 24        haloalkyl, amino, or nitro groups;25            (D) replacement of the aniline ring with any 26        aromatic monocycle whether or not further substituted   SB3221- 60 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        in or on the aromatic monocycle; or2            (E) replacement of the N-propionyl group by 3        another acyl group.4        (2) "Fentanyl-related substance" includes, but is not 5    limited to, the following substances:6            (A) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl;7            (B) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-(1-alpha-methyl-beta- 8        phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl) propionanilide; 9        1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) 10        piperidine;11            (C) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2- 12        thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);13            (D) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2- 14        phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide15            (E) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2- 16        phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);17            (F) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1- 18        (2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);19            (G) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)- 20        N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]propanamide);21            (H) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl- 22        4-piperidinyl]-propanamide);23            (I) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (other name: 24        N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl- 25        4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);26            (J) Furanyl fentanyl (FU-F);  SB3221- 61 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1            (K) Butyryl fentanyl;2            (L) Valeryl fentanyl;3            (M) Acetyl fentanyl;4            (N) Beta-hydroxy-thiofentanyl;5            (O) Acrylfentanyl (acryloylfentanyl);6            (P) Cyclopropyl fentanyl;7            (Q) Crotonyl fentanyl;8            (R) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl;9            (S) Pentanoyl fentanyl;10            (T) Cyclopentyl fentanyl;11            (U) Isobutyryl fentanyl;12            (V) Benzodioxolefentanyl;13            (W) Tetrahydrofuran fentanyl. 14(Source: P.A. 103-245, eff. 1-1-24.) 15    (720 ILCS 570/206)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1206)16    Sec. 206. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 17Section are included in Schedule II.18    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 19another schedule, any of the following substances whether 20produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances 21of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical 22synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical 23synthesis:24        (1) Opium and opiates, and any salt, compound, 25    derivative or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding   SB3221- 62 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    apomorphine, dextrorphan, levopropoxyphene, nalbuphine, 2    nalmefene, naloxone, and naltrexone, and their respective 3    salts, but including the following:4            (i) Raw Opium;5            (ii) Opium extracts;6            (iii) Opium fluid extracts;7            (iv) Powdered opium;8            (v) Granulated opium;9            (vi) Tincture of opium;10            (vii) Codeine;11            (viii) Ethylmorphine;12            (ix) Etorphine Hydrochloride;13            (x) Hydrocodone;14            (xi) Hydromorphone;15            (xii) Metopon;16            (xiii) Morphine;17            (xiii.5) 6-Monoacetylmorphine; 18            (xiv) Oxycodone;19            (xv) Oxymorphone;20            (xv.5) Tapentadol; 21            (xvi) Thebaine;22            (xvii) Thebaine-derived butorphanol.23            (xviii) Methorphan, except drug products 24        containing dextromethorphan that may be dispensed 25        pursuant to a prescription order of a practitioner and 26        are sold in compliance with the safety and labeling   SB3221- 63 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        standards as set forth by the United States Food and 2        Drug Administration, or drug products containing 3        dextromethorphan that are sold in solid, tablet, 4        liquid, capsule, powder, thin film, or gel form and 5        which are formulated, packaged, and sold in dosages 6        and concentrations for use as an over-the-counter drug 7        product. For the purposes of this Section, 8        "over-the-counter drug product" means a drug that is 9        available to consumers without a prescription and sold 10        in compliance with the safety and labeling standards 11        as set forth by the United States Food and Drug 12        Administration. 13        (2) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative or 14    preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or 15    identical with any of the substances referred to in 16    subparagraph (1), but not including the isoquinoline 17    alkaloids of opium;18        (3) Opium poppy and poppy straw;19        (4) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, isomer, salt 20    of an isomer, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves 21    including cocaine or ecgonine, and any salt, compound, 22    isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is 23    chemically equivalent or identical with any of these 24    substances, but not including decocainized coca leaves or 25    extractions of coca leaves which do not contain cocaine or 26    ecgonine (for the purpose of this paragraph, the term   SB3221- 64 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    "isomer" includes optical, positional and geometric 2    isomers);3        (5) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of 4    poppy straw in either liquid, solid or powder form which 5    contains the phenanthrine alkaloids of the opium poppy).6    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 7another schedule any of the following opiates, including their 8isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, whenever 9the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is 10possible within the specific chemical designation, dextrorphan 11excepted:12        (1) Alfentanil;13        (1.1) Carfentanil;14        (1.2) Thiafentanyl; 15        (2) Alphaprodine;16        (3) Anileridine;17        (4) Bezitramide;18        (5) Bulk Dextropropoxyphene (non-dosage forms);19        (6) Dihydrocodeine;20        (7) Diphenoxylate;21        (8) Fentanyl;22        (9) Sufentanil;23        (9.5) Remifentanil;24        (10) Isomethadone;25        (11) (Blank);26        (12) Levorphanol (Levorphan);  SB3221- 65 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (13) Metazocine;2        (14) Methadone;3        (15) Methadone-Intermediate, 4    4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4,4-diphenyl-1-butane;5        (16) Moramide-Intermediate, 6    2-methyl-3-morpholino-1,1-diphenylpropane-carboxylic 7    acid;8        (17) Pethidine (meperidine);9        (18) Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 10    4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;11        (19) Pethidine-Intermediate-B, 12    ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;13        (20) Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 14    1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;15        (21) Phenazocine;16        (22) Piminodine;17        (23) Racemethorphan;18        (24) (Blank);19        (25) Levo-alphacetylmethadol (some other names: 20    levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, LAAM).21    (d) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 22another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 23preparation which contains any quantity of the following 24substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 25system:26        (1) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts   SB3221- 66 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    of its optical isomers;2        (2) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of 3    its isomers;4        (3) Phenmetrazine and its salts;5        (4) Methylphenidate;6        (5) Lisdexamfetamine. 7    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 8another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 9preparation which contains any quantity of the following 10substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous 11system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers 12whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of 13isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:14        (1) Amobarbital;15        (2) Secobarbital;16        (3) Pentobarbital;17        (4) Pentazocine;18        (5) Phencyclidine;19        (6) Gluthethimide;20        (7) (Blank). 21    (f) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 22another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 23preparation which contains any quantity of the following 24substances:25        (1) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and 26    methamphetamine:  SB3221- 67 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1            (i) Phenylacetone2        Some trade or other names: phenyl-2-propanone;3        P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; methyl benzyl ketone.4        (2) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine:5            (i) 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;6            (ii) 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC).7        (3) Nabilone.8(Source: P.A. 100-368, eff. 1-1-18.) 9    (720 ILCS 570/208)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1208)10    Sec. 208. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 11Section are included in Schedule III.12    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 13another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 14preparation which contains any quantity of the following 15substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 16system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical 17position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever 18the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is 19possible within the specific chemical designation;20        (1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in 21    dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances 22    listed in Schedule II which compounds, mixtures, or 23    preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted 24    compounds under Title 21, Code of Federal Regulations, 25    Section 308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative   SB3221- 68 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    composition shown in that list for those drugs or which is 2    the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of 3    controlled substances;4        (2) Benzphetamine;5        (3) Chlorphentermine;6        (4) Clortermine;7        (5) Phendimetrazine.8    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 9another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 10preparation which contains any quantity of the following 11substances having a potential for misuse associated with a 12depressant effect on the central nervous system:13        (1) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing 14    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt 15    thereof and one or more other active medicinal ingredients 16    which are not listed in any schedule;17        (2) Any suppository dosage form containing 18    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt of 19    any of these drugs and approved by the Federal Food and 20    Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository;21        (3) Any substance which contains any quantity of a 22    derivative of barbituric acid, or any salt thereof:23        (3.1) Aprobarbital;24        (3.2) Butabarbital (secbutabarbital);25        (3.3) Butalbital;26        (3.4) Butobarbital (butethal);   SB3221- 69 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (4) Chlorhexadol;2        (5) Methyprylon;3        (6) Sulfondiethylmethane;4        (7) Sulfonethylmethane;5        (8) Sulfonmethane;6        (9) Lysergic acid;7        (10) Lysergic acid amide;8        (10.1) Tiletamine or zolazepam or both, or any salt of 9    either of them.10    Some trade or other names for a tiletamine-zolazepam 11    combination product: Telazol. 12    Some trade or other names for Tiletamine: 13    2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone. 14    Some trade or other names for zolazepam: 15    4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo- 16    [3,4-e], [1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, and flupyrazapon.17        (11) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 18    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 19    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of aspirin;20        (12) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 21    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 22    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of acetaminophen;23        (13) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 24    containing not more than 50 milligrams of pentazocine or 25    any of its salts plus naloxone HCl USP 0.5 milligrams, per 26    dosage unit;  SB3221- 70 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (14) Ketamine;2        (15) Thiopental; . 3        (16) Xylazine. 4    (d) Nalorphine.5    (d.5) Buprenorphine. 6    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 7another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 8preparation containing limited quantities of any of the 9following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the 10free anhydrous base or alkaloid, as set forth below:11        (1) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 12    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 13    unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline 14    alkaloid of opium;15        (2) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 16    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 17    unit, with one or more active non-narcotic ingredients in 18    recognized therapeutic amounts;19        (3) (blank);20        (4) (blank);21        (5) not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 22    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 23    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 24    recognized therapeutic amounts;25        (6) not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 26    100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage   SB3221- 71 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 2    recognized therapeutic amounts;3        (7) not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 4    milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 5    milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, 6    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 7    amounts;8        (8) not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 9    milliliters or per 100 grams with one or more active, 10    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 11    amounts.12    (f) Anabolic steroids, except the following anabolic 13steroids that are exempt:14        (1) Androgyn L.A.;15        (2) Andro-Estro 90-4;16        (3) depANDROGYN;17        (4) DEPO-T.E.;18        (5) depTESTROGEN;19        (6) Duomone;20        (7) DURATESTRIN;21        (8) DUO-SPAN II;22        (9) Estratest;23        (10) Estratest H.S.;24        (11) PAN ESTRA TEST;25        (12) Premarin with Methyltestosterone;26        (13) TEST-ESTRO Cypionates;  SB3221- 72 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1        (14) Testosterone Cyp 50 Estradiol Cyp 2;2        (15) Testosterone Cypionate-Estradiol Cypionate 3    injection; and4        (16) Testosterone Enanthate-Estradiol Valerate 5    injection.6    (g) Hallucinogenic substances.7        (1) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and 8    encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a U.S. Food and 9    Drug Administration approved product. Some other names for 10    dronabinol: (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro- 11    6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo (b,d) pyran-1-ol) or 12    (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.13        (2) (Reserved).14    (h) The Department may except by rule any compound, 15mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant 16substance listed in subsection (b) from the application of all 17or any part of this Act if the compound, mixture, or 18preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients 19not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central 20nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in 21combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that 22vitiate the potential for misuse of the substances which have 23a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous 24system.25(Source: P.A. 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.)   SB3221- 73 -LRB104 20204 RLC 33655 b1    (720 ILCS 570/309.1 new)2    Sec. 309.1. Xylazine exemptions. Notwithstanding the 3scheduling of xylazine as a Schedule III controlled substance, 4xylazine shall not be considered a controlled substance when:5        (1) used by licensed Illinois veterinarians dispensing 6    or prescribing for, or administering to, a nonhuman 7    species of a drug containing xylazine that has been 8    approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;9        (2) used by licensed Illinois veterinarians dispensing 10    or prescribing for, or administering to, a nonhuman 11    species that is permissible under the Federal Food, Drug, 12    and Cosmetic Act;13        (3) manufactured, distributed, or used as an active 14    pharmaceutical ingredient for manufacturing an animal drug 15    approved under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;16        (4) used by a licensed certified euthanasia technician 17    employed by a certified euthanasia agency; or18        (5) used by a wildlife biologist engaged in legal or 19    authorized fieldwork under the indirect supervision of a 20    veterinarian. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 221, 2027.